Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-316
Levees; dikes; construction; special assessments.

As soon as the contract or contracts are let for the construction of the work as provided in section 23-315, the supervisors or board of county commissioners shall levy a special assessment on all the lands specially benefited in accordance with the benefits received as confirmed and adjudged in a sum as may be necessary to pay for the work and all costs and expenses accrued or to accrue, not exceeding the whole benefit upon any one tract.

Laws 1921, c. 269, § 8, p. 896;

C.S.1922, § 1033;

C.S.1929, § 26-727;

R.S.1943, § 23-316;

Laws 2015, LB361, § 47.